Alabama, session 2026rs, SB94.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
14 Section 1. Section 32-6-233.1, Code of Alabama 1975, as
15 last amended by Act 2025-399 of the 2025 Regular Session, and
16 pursuant to that act is effective until October 1, 2028, is
17 amended to read as follows:
18 "§32-6-233.1
19 (a)(1) It shall be unlawful for any person individual
20 who does not have a distinctive special long-term access or
21 long-term disability access license plate or placard or
22 temporary disability placard as provided in Section 32-6-231,
23 or who is not transporting a passenger who has a distinctive
24 special long-term access or long-term disability access
25 license plate or placard or temporary disability placard as
26 provided in Section 32-6-231, to park a motor vehicle in a
27 parking place designated for individuals with disabilities at
28 any place of public accommodation, at any business or legal
Page 1

any place of public accommodation, at any business or legal
SB94 Enrolled
29 entity engaged in interstate commerce or which is subject to
30 any federal or state laws requiring access by individuals with
31 disabilities, at any amusement facility or resort, or at any
32 other place to which the general public is invited or
33 solicited, even though located on private property., unless
34 the individual meets one of the following requirements:
35 a. The individual is the lawful holder of a distinctive
36 special long-term access or long-term disability access
37 license plate or placard or a temporary disability placard.
38 b. The individual is transporting a passenger who is a
39 lawful holder of a distinctive special long-term access or
40 long-term disability access license plate or placard or a
41 temporary disability placard.
42 (2) Upon conviction, notwithstanding any other penalty
43 provision that may be authorized or employed, the person
44 individual shall be fined a minimum of fifty dollars ($50) for
45 the first offense, a minimum of two hundred dollars ($200) for
46 the second offense, and a minimum of five hundred dollars
47 ($500) for the third or any subsequent offense. In addition,
48 for the second or any subsequent offense under this section
49 subdivision (1), the person individual shall be ordered by the
50 court to perform a minimum of 40 hours of either of the
51 following forms of community service:
52 (1)a. Community service for a nonprofit organization
53 that serves individuals with disabilities or serves
54 individuals who have a disabling disease.
55 (2)b. Any other community service that may sensitize
56 the individuals individual to the needs and obstacles faced
Page 2

the individuals individual to the needs and obstacles faced
SB94 Enrolled
57 daily by individuals with disabilities.
58 (b) Any authorized municipal, county, or state law
59 enforcement officer may go on private property to enforce this
60 section.
61 (c) This section may be enforced by any law enforcement
62 officer who has successfully complied with the minimum
63 standards for police officers as set forth in Section
64 36-21-46, including, but not limited to, municipal law
65 enforcement officers, sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, and Alabama
66 State Troopers. Any law enforcement officer enforcing this
67 section may ask for verification that either the driver or a
68 passenger of the parked vehicle is the lawful holder of a
69 distinctive special long-term access or long-term disability
70 access license plate or placard or temporary disability
71 placard.
72 (d) Any sign designating a special access parking or
73 disability access parking place may contain on the sign or
74 attached to the sign the amount of the fine for a parking
75 violation on the first offense pursuant to subsection (a).
76 (e)(1) If the law enforcement officer who issues the
77 special access parking or disability access parking violation
78 is employed by a local law enforcement agency, 100 percent of
79 the fines collected pursuant to this section shall be paid to
80 the municipal or county general fund for the use of the law
81 enforcement agency by whom the arresting officer is employed.
82 (2) If the law enforcement officer who issues the
83 special access parking or disability access parking violation
84 is employed by a state law enforcement agency, the fines
Page 3

is employed by a state law enforcement agency, the fines
SB94 Enrolled
85 collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the
86 State Treasury, to be deposited in a separate fund to be
87 distributed 50 percent to the law enforcement agency by whom
88 the arresting officer is employed,; 25 percent to the
89 Administrative Office of Courts, to be expended for support of
90 the trial courts,; and 25 percent to the Department of Mental
91 Health, to be expended for the Individual and Family Support
92 Program for individuals with developmental disabilities.
93 (3) All funds deposited to a separate fund in the State
94 Treasury pursuant to this subsection to be expended by the
95 Department of Mental Health, the Administrative Office of
96 Courts, and state law enforcement agencies shall be
97 appropriated by the Legislature, for the purposes stated in
98 this subsection. The expenditure of such sums so appropriated
99 shall be budgeted and allotted pursuant to the Budget
100 Management Act and Article 4 of Chapter 4 of Title 41. No
101 monies deposited to this fund shall revert to the State
102 General Fund at the end of any fiscal year. Prior to the
103 release of any monies to the Individual and Family Support
104 Program, such expenditures shall first be approved by the
105 Commissioner of the Department of Mental Health.
106 (f) This section shall be held in pari materia with all
107 other provisions of law related to illegal special access
108 parking or disability access parking violations and all laws
109 or parts of laws which conflict with this section are
110 repealed.
111 (g) Municipal law enforcement officers, sheriffs,
112 deputy sheriffs, and Alabama State Troopers, may cause
Page 4

deputy sheriffs, and Alabama State Troopers, may cause
SB94 Enrolled
113 vehicles illegally parked in accessible parking spaces to be
114 towed.
115 (h) Municipal law enforcement officers, sheriffs,
116 deputy sheriffs, and Alabama State Troopers may issue
117 violations for vehicles parked on access aisles. "Access
118 aisles" are defined as the hash-marked or cross-striped space
119 spaces that is are five feet or eight feet wide which is and
120 are directly next to the accessible parking space. "Access
121 aisle" also has the same definition as contained within the
122 2010 Accessible Design Standards within the Americans with
123 Disabilities Act."
124 Section 2. Section 32-6-233.1, Code of Alabama 1975, as
125 last amended by Act 2025-399 of the 2025 Regular Session and
126 pursuant to that act takes effect October 1, 2028, is amended
127 to read as follows:
128 "§32-6-233.1
129 (a)(1) It shall be unlawful for any individual person who does
130 not have a distinctive special long-term access or long-term
131 disability access license plate or placard or temporary
132 disability placard as provided in Section 32-6-231, or who is
133 not transporting a passenger who has a distinctive special
134 long-term access or long-term disability access license plate
135 or placard or temporary disability placard as provided in
136 Section 32-6-231, to park a motor vehicle in a parking place
137 designated for individuals with disabilities at any place of
138 public accommodation, at any business or legal entity engaged
139 in interstate commerce or which is subject to any federal or
140 state laws requiring access by individuals with disabilities,
Page 5

state laws requiring access by individuals with disabilities,
SB94 Enrolled
141 at any amusement facility or resort, or at any other place to
142 which the general public is invited or solicited, even though
143 located on private property., unless the individual meets one
144 of the following requirements:
145 a. The individual is the lawful holder of a distinctive
146 special long-term access or long-term disability access
147 license plate or placard or a temporary disability placard.
148 b. The individual is transporting a passenger who is a
149 lawful holder of a distinctive special long-term access or
150 long-term disability access license plate or placard or a
151 temporary disability placard.
152 (2) Upon conviction, notwithstanding any other penalty
153 provision that may be authorized or employed, the person
154 individual shall be fined a minimum of fifty dollars ($50) for
155 the first offense, a minimum of two hundred dollars ($200) for
156 the second offense, and a minimum of five hundred dollars
157 ($500) for the third or any subsequent offense. In addition,
158 for the second or any subsequent offense under this section
159 subdivision (1), the person individual shall be ordered by the
160 court to perform a minimum of 40 hours of either of the
161 following forms of community service:
162 (1)a. Community service for a nonprofit organization
163 that serves individuals with disabilities or serves
164 individuals who have a disabling disease.
165 (2)b. Any other community service that may sensitize
166 the individuals individual to the needs and obstacles faced
167 daily by individuals with disabilities.
168 (b) Any authorized municipal, county, or state law
Page 6

(b) Any authorized municipal, county, or state law
SB94 Enrolled
169 enforcement officer may go on private property to enforce this
170 section.
171 (c) This section may be enforced by any law enforcement
172 officer who has successfully complied with the minimum
173 standards for police officers as set forth in Section
174 36-21-46, including, but not limited to, municipal law
175 enforcement officers, sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, and Alabama
176 State Troopers. Any law enforcement officer enforcing this
177 section may ask for verification that either the driver or a
178 passenger of the parked vehicle is the lawful holder of a
179 distinctive special long-term access or long-term disability
180 access license plate or placard or temporary disability
181 placard.
182 (d) Any sign designating a special access parking or
183 disability access parking place may contain on the sign or
184 attached to the sign the amount of the fine for a parking
185 violation on the first offense pursuant to subsection (a).
186 (e)(1) If the law enforcement officer who issues the
187 special access parking or disability access parking violation
188 is employed by a local law enforcement agency, 50 percent of
189 the fines collected pursuant to this section shall be paid to
190 the municipal or county general fund for the use of the law
191 enforcement agency by whom the arresting officer is employed
192 with the remainder to be remitted to the State Treasury, to be
193 deposited in a separate fund to be distributed 50 percent to
194 the Administrative Office of Courts, to be expended for
195 support of the trial courts, and 50 percent to the Department
196 of Mental Health, to be expended for the Individual and Family
Page 7

of Mental Health, to be expended for the Individual and Family
SB94 Enrolled
197 Support Program for individuals with developmental
198 disabilities.
199 (2) If the law enforcement officer who issues the
200 special access parking or disability access parking violation
201 is employed by a state law enforcement agency, the fines
202 collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the
203 State Treasury, to be deposited in a separate fund to be
204 distributed 50 percent to the law enforcement agency by whom
205 the arresting officer is employed,; 25 percent to the
206 Administrative Office of Courts, to be expended for support of
207 the trial courts,; and 25 percent to the Department of Mental
208 Health, to be expended for the Individual and Family Support
209 Program for individuals with developmental disabilities.
210 (3) All funds deposited to a separate fund in the State
211 Treasury pursuant to this subsection to be expended by the
212 Department of Mental Health, the Administrative Office of
213 Courts, and state law enforcement agencies shall be
214 appropriated by the Legislature, for the purposes stated in
215 this subsection. The expenditure of such sums so appropriated
216 shall be budgeted and allotted pursuant to the Budget
217 Management Act and Article 4 of Chapter 4 of Title 41. No
218 monies deposited to this fund shall revert to the State
219 General Fund at the end of any fiscal year. Prior to the
220 release of any monies to the Individual and Family Support
221 Program, such expenditures shall first be approved by the
222 Commissioner of the Department of Mental Health.
223 (f) This section shall be held in pari materia with all
224 other provisions of law related to illegal special access
Page 8

other provisions of law related to illegal special access
SB94 Enrolled
225 parking or disability access parking violations and all laws
226 or parts of laws which conflict with this section are
227 repealed.
228 (g) Municipal law enforcement officers, sheriffs,
229 deputy sheriffs, and Alabama State Troopers, may cause
230 vehicles illegally parked in accessible parking spaces to be
231 towed.
232 (h) Municipal law enforcement officers, sheriffs,
233 deputy sheriffs, and Alabama State Troopers may issue
234 violations for vehicles parked on access aisles. "Access
235 aisles" are defined as the hash-marked or cross-striped space
236 spaces that is are five feet or eight feet wide which is and
237 are directly next to the accessible parking space. "Access
238 aisle" also has the same definition as contained within the
239 2010 Accessible Design Standards within the Americans with
240 Disabilities Act."
241 Section 3. Sections 32-6-231 and 40-12-300, Code of
242 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
243 "§32-6-231
244 (a) Any individual who submits to the license issuing
245 official a completed special access parking or disability
246 access parking application form approved by the Commissioner
247 of Revenue which includes the physician's certification that
248 he or she is an individual with a disability shall be issued
249 one removable windshield placard displaying the Dynamic
250 Accessibility Symbol, thereby designating the driver of the
251 vehicle or the passenger as being an individual with a
252 disability.
Page 9

disability.
SB94 Enrolled
253 (1) The removable windshield placard shall be prepared
254 by the commissioner in conformity to Public Law 100-641 and
255 rulemaking resulting therefrom.
256 (2)a. The removable windshield placard issued to the
257 individual with a long-term disability shall expire after a
258 maximum period of five years or any period less than five
259 years to be designated by the commissioner. The placard shall
260 clearly reveal the expiration date and shall be designed in
261 accordance with Public Law 100-641 and rulemaking resulting
262 therefrom to hang from the front windshield rearview mirror
263 when the vehicle is parked in a parking space reserved for
264 individuals with disabilities. If the vehicle lacks a rearview
265 mirror, the placard shall be placed on the dashboard.
266 b. The commissioner may require all individuals with
267 long-term disabilities to be recertified by a licensed
268 physician before special access or disability access parking
269 new removable windshield placards may be reissued.
270 (3) In the event that an individual with a disability
271 does not have the distinctive special access or disability
272 access license plate as provided by Sections 40-12-300 to
273 40-12-302, inclusive under Division 3 of Article 5 of Chapter
274 12 of Title 40, upon request, a second placard may be issued.
275 (b) The commissioner may adopt any rules necessary to
276 administer this division.
277 (c) An individual with a temporary disability, who
278 submits to the license issuing official a completed special
279 access or disability access application form approved by the
280 commissioner which includes the physician's certification that
Page 10

commissioner which includes the physician's certification that
SB94 Enrolled
281 he or she is an individual with a temporary disability, shall
282 be issued one temporary removable windshield placard for a
283 period valid up to six months.
284 (d)(1) A removable windshield placard issued to an
285 individual with a long-term or temporary disability shall
286 expire one week following the death of the disabled
287 individual.
288 (2) The executor of the estate of any disabled
289 individual who has been issued a removable windshield placard
290 shall notify the local licensing official of the disabled
291 individual's death either at the time of probate proceedings
292 or within 90 days of the disabled individual's death,
293 whichever comes first.
294 (e) Any special access or disability access placard
295 that is not in conformity with the federal system rule for
296 parking reserved for individuals with disabilities, Public Law
297 100-641, and subsequent Rule 23 C.F.R. § 1235, shall not be
298 recognized as a valid disabled parking credential."
299 "§40-12-300
300 (a)(1) The distinctive license plates provided for
301 herein shall be prepared by the Commissioner of Revenue and
302 shall be issued through the county license issuing officials
303 of the state in the same manner as are other motor vehicle
304 license plates. An applicant for a distinctive plate shall
305 present to the issuing official documentation that he or she
306 is either of the following:
307 a. A parent, stepparent, or legal guardian of a minor
308 or an adult who is an individual with a disability as defined
Page 11

or an adult who is an individual with a disability as defined
SB94 Enrolled
309 in Section 32-6-230.
310 b. An individual with a disability as defined in
311 Section 32-6-230.
312 (2) Upon presentation of the required documentation,
313 the applicant shall be issued the requested number of special
314 access or disability access distinctive license plates upon
315 the payment of the regular license fee, as provided by law.
316 (b) Any private agency, nursing home, church, or
317 charitable institution that submits to the licensing authority
318 proof satisfactory to the commissioner that it operates a
319 motor vehicle for the primary purpose of transporting one or
320 more individuals with disabilities may apply for the
321 distinctive plates. Applicants shall pay the regular fees for
322 license plates, as provided by law.
323 (c) Any government agency that applies for a license
324 plate for a vehicle that it owns for the primary purpose of
325 transporting individuals with disabilities shall be issued the
326 requested number of license plates according to Section
327 40-12-250, with the plate displaying the Dynamic Accessibility
328 Symbol embossed on the plate.
329 (d) The distinctive license plates shall be used only
330 upon and for personally-owned, private, or government owned
331 and operated passenger vehicles, including, but not limited
332 to, vans, station wagons, buses, motorcycles, and pickup
333 trucks, registered in the name of the individual or public or
334 private agency, nursing home, church, or charitable
335 institution making application therefor, and when issued to
336 the applicant shall be used upon the vehicle for which issued
Page 12

the applicant shall be used upon the vehicle for which issued
SB94 Enrolled
337 in lieu of the standard license plates normally issued for the
338 vehicle. This division shall not be construed to require an
339 individual with a disability to display a distinctive special
340 access or disability access license plate. It is specifically
341 provided that this division shall be construed in pari materia
342 with Section 32-6-231. The commissioner may adopt any rules
343 necessary to carry out this division.
344 (e) The commissioner may require all individuals with
345 long-term disabilities to be recertified by a licensed
346 physician before special access parking or disability access
347 parking license plates may be reissued.
348 (f) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, a
349 motor vehicle may not be parked in an area reserved for
350 individuals with disabilities to park, in a manner that
351 violates Section 32-6-233.1, shall be subject to the penalties
352 provided therein. unless the individual with a disability is
353 in the vehicle."
354 Section 4. (a) On or after January 1, 2027, the
355 Department of Revenue shall develop and implement an
356 electronic scanning system through which a scannable barcode
357 or quick response code shall appear on disability placards
358 and, upon scanning, shall link to the disability placard
359 holder's name and the status of the disability placard.
360 (b) The Commissioner of Revenue shall adopt rules as
361 necessary to implement this section. At a minimum, the rules
362 shall address all of the following:
363 (1) The creation of a scannable barcode or quick
364 response code linked to a disability placard holder's name and
Page 13

response code linked to a disability placard holder's name and
SB94 Enrolled
365 the status of the disability placard as active or expired.
366 (2) The appearance of the scannable barcode or quick
367 response code on disability placards.
368 (3) That the system and the information contained
369 within the system may only be accessed by the Department of
370 Revenue and law enforcement agencies enforcing Sections
371 32-6-233 and 32-6-233.1, Code of Alabama 1975.
372 Section 5. This act shall become effective on October
373 1, 2026, except Section 2 shall become effective October 1,
374 2028.
Page 14

2028.
SB94 Enrolled
375
376
377
378
379
380
381 ________________________________________________
382 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
383
384
385
386 ________________________________________________
387 Speaker of the House of Representatives
388
389
390 SB94
391 Senate 19-Feb-26
392 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
393 the Senate, as amended.
394
395 Patrick Harris,
396 Secretary.
397
398
399
400
401 House of Representatives
402 Amended and passed: 07-Apr-26
403
404
405
406
407 Senate concurred in House amendment 07-Apr-26
408
409
410
411
412 By: Senator Melson
Page 15